Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1033.01
Mobile cosmetology salon, defined.

Mobile cosmetology salon means a self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed mobile unit licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act as a mobile site for the performance of the practices of cosmetology by persons licensed under the act.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 9.